Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-404
Civil service commission; formation.

In any county having a population of four hundred thousand inhabitants or more as determined by the most recent federal decennial census, there shall be a civil service commission which shall be formed as provided in the County Civil Service Commission Act. A county shall comply with this section within six months after a determination that the population has reached four hundred thousand inhabitants or more as determined by the most recent federal decennial census.

Laws 1971, LB 921, § 3;

Laws 2016, LB742, § 9;

Laws 2017, LB508, § 1;

R.S.Supp.,2018, § 23-2503;

Laws 2019, LB411, § 4.